th: ทักษะความคล่องแคล่ว: การปรับสมดุล; สหสัมพันธ์ระหว่างตากับมือ; ปัดขนตาได้อย่างแม่นยำ; ไขปริศนา; ความเร็วของปฏิกิริยา; การเรียงซ้อน; อื่นๆ
hu: Ügyességi készségek: Egyensúlyozás; Szem-kéz koordináció; Pontosság; Kirakós játék; Reakciósebesség; Egymásra helyezés; Egyéb
sv: Fingerfärdighet: Balansering; Hand-öga-koordination; Precision; Pussel; Reaktionshastighet; Stapling; Övrigt
es: Habilidades de destreza: Equilibrio; Coordinación mano-ojo; Precisión; Rompecabezas; Velocidad de reacción; Apilado; Otros
hr-HR: Vještine spretnosti: Ravnoteža; Koordinacija oko-ruka; Preciznost; Puzzle; Brzina reakcije; Slaganje u visinu; Ostalo
pt-PT: Competências de destreza: Equilíbrio; Coordenação mão-olho; Precisão; Puzzle; Velocidade de reação; Empilhamento; Outro
nl: Behendigheidsvaardigheden: Balanceren; Hand-oogcoördinatie; Precisie; Puzzel; Reactiesnelheid; Stapelen; Andere
nb: Behendighetsferdigheter: Balansering; Hånd-øye-koordinasjon; Presisjon; Puslespill; Reaksjonshastighet; Stabling; Annet
it: Abilità di destrezza: Bilanciamento; Coordinazione occhio-mano; Precisione; Puzzle; Velocità di reazione; Impilamento; Altro
tr: El becerisi yetenekleri: Dengeleme; El-göz koordinasyonu; Kesinlik; Bulmaca; Reaksiyon hızı; İstifleme; Diğer
cs: Obratnostní dovednosti: Vyvážení; Koordinace rukou a očí; Přesná; Puzzle; Rychlost reakce; Stohování; Jiné
lt-LT: Vikrumo įgūdžiai: Balansavimas; Rankų ir akių koordinacija; Smulkioji motorika; Dėlionės; Reakcijos greitis; Piramidės statymas; Kita
ro-RO: Abilități de dexteritate: Echilibru; Coordonarea mână-ochi; Precizie; Puzzle; Viteză de reacție; Stivuit; Altele
sl-SI: Spretnosti fine motorike: Uravnoteženje; Koordinacija roka-oko; Natančnost; Puzle; Hitrost reakcije; Zlaganje; Drugo
zh-CN: 敏捷技能: 平衡; 手眼协调; 精准; 拼图; 反应速度; 堆叠; 其他
fr: Compétences de dextérité: Équilibrage; Coordination œil-main; Pointe de précision; Puzzle; Vitesse de réaction; Empilage; Autre
da: Behændighedsfærdigheder: Balancering; Hånd-øje-koordination; Præcision; Puslespil; Reaktionshastighed; Stabling; Andet
pt-BR: Habilidades de destreza: Equilíbrio; Coordenação mão-olho; Precisão; Quebra-cabeça; Velocidade de reação; Empilhamento; Outro
ko: 손재주 기술: 밸런싱; 손과 눈의 협응; 정도; 퍼즐; 반응 속도; 쌓기; 기타
de: Geschicklichkeit: Ausgleichend; Hand-Auge-Koordination; Präzision; Puzzle; Reaktionsgeschwindigkeit; Stapeln; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Умения, свързани със сръчност: Балансираща; Координация ръка-око; Прецизност; Пъзел; Скорост на реакция; Подреждане; Други
vi: Kỹ năng khéo tay: Cân bằng; Phối hợp tay mắt; Chính xác; Giải đố; Tốc độ phản ứng; Xếp chồng; Khác
en: Dexterity skills: Balancing; Hand-eye coordination; Precision; Puzzle; Reaction speed; Stacking; Other
el: Δεξιότητες επιδεξιότητας: Ισορροπία; Συντονισμός χεριού-ματιού; Ακριβείας; Επίλυση γρίφων; Ταχύτητα αντίδρασης; Στοίβαξη; Άλλο
ru: Необходимые навыки: Балансировка; Координация движений рук и глаз; Точность; Головоломка; Скорость реакции; Складывание; Другое
zh-TW: 嫻熟技能: 平衡; 眼手協調; 精密; 益智; 反應速度; 堆疊; 其他
pl: Zręczność: Balansowanie; Koordynacja wzrokowo-ruchowa; Precyzja; Puzzle; Szybkość reakcji; Układanie; Inne
ja: 器用さのスキル: バランス調整; 視覚と手の協調; プレシジョン; パズル; 反応速度; スタッキング; その他
sk-SK: Obratnosť: Vyvažovanie; Koordinácia očí a rúk; Presnosť; Puzzle; Rýchlosť reakcie; Stohovanie; Iné
fi: Kätevyystaidot: Tasapainottaminen; Käsi-silmä-koordinaatio; Tarkasti levittyvä; Palapeli; Reaktionopeus; Pinoaminen; Muu